Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2505
Tax or license; prohibited.

No county, city, village, or other municipal subdivision may impose a tax on, or require a license for, a ride-sharing arrangement using a motor vehicle with a seating capacity for not more than fifteen persons, including the driver.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 5.